North Carolina, session 2025, SB378.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. AMEND LAWS GOVERNING OWNERS' ASSOCIATIONS IN
CONDOMINIUMS AND PLANNED COMMUNITIES
SECTION 1. G.S. 47C-3-102(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 47C-3-102. Powers of unit owners' association.
(a) Unless the declaration expressly provides to the contrary, the association, even if
unincorporated, may do all of the following:
…
(3) Hire and terminate managing agents and other employees, agents, and
independent contractors. A contract between an association and a managing
agent shall not have a term exceeding two years and shall not contain an
automatic renewal provision that requires the association to give notice of
nonrenewal more than 60 days prior to the contract's anniversary date. Any
contract with a managing agent that is automatically renewed shall be
terminable by the association for any reason upon 90 days' notice. A managing
agent shall not be compensated in whole or in part based on the amount of
fines collected by the managing agent on behalf of the association.
…
(6) Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of
common elements.elements; provided, however, that in the absence of an
express authorization in the declaration, an association shall not enforce any
restriction on parking of a personal vehicle on a public street, public road, or
public right-of-way for which the North Carolina Department of
Transportation or local government has assumed responsibility for
maintenance and repairs, unless the authority to regulate such parking has
been expressly delegated to the association by the Department of
Transportation or local government under an agreement prescribing the
manner in which the association may exercise that authority. As used in this
*S378-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subdivision, "personal vehicle" means an automobile with a gross weight of
less than 26,001 pounds that is used for personal pleasure, travel, or
commuting to and from a place of work, and does not include a motor home
or self-propelled recreational vehicle, or an automobile that is otherwise used
primarily in connection with any commercial endeavor or business.
…
(11) Impose charges for late payment of assessments, not to exceed the greater of
twenty dollars ($20.00) per month or ten percent (10%) of any assessment
installment unpaid and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, suspend
privileges or services provided by the association (except rights of access to
lots) during any period that assessments or other amounts due and owing to
the association remain unpaid for a period of 30 days or longer, and levy
reasonable fines not to exceed one hundred dollars
($100.00)(G.S. 47C-3-107.1) for violations of the declaration, bylaws, and
rules and regulations of the association. No fine shall be levied for violation
of a provision restricting or prohibiting tutoring, educational lessons,
academic lessons, or music lessons provided in the owner's unit to a group of
no more than five people at any one time, regardless of whether compensation
is received for such lessons.
…
(12a) Impose reasonable charges in connection with the preparation of statements a
lender's questionnaire or certification or a statement of unpaid assessments,
which must be furnished within 10 business days after receipt of the request,
in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) per statement or
request, item requested, and an additional expedite expedited fee in an amount
not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) if the request is made within 48
hours of closing, all of which item is requested to be furnished less than 10
days after receipt of the request. These charges may be collected by the
association, its managers, or its agents. Any charge for preparation of a
lender's questionnaire or certification shall be billed to the requesting party.
Neither the association nor its managing agent shall impose any charge upon
a unit owner or a prospective purchaser of a unit in connection with the
conveyance of a unit unless the charge is expressly authorized in this
subdivision, or unless the charge is authorized in the declaration and is not
otherwise expressly prohibited by law. Violation of this subdivision by an
association or by its managing agent shall constitute an unfair and deceptive
trade practice under G.S. 75-1.1.
(12b) Impose a reasonable charge for providing copies of records requested by a
member, not to exceed the actual cost of photocopying the records, including
the cost of materials used in responding to the request and the cost of shipping
if shipping is required.
…
(14a) Exercise any authority granted to it under the declaration to approve or
disapprove any proposed changes to a unit or limited common element. In
exercising such authority, the association shall provide a fair, reasonable, and
expeditious procedure for making its decision, which procedure shall be set
forth in the association's governing documents. The procedures shall state the
maximum time for issuance of any decision on a proposal or a request for
reconsideration. An association may adopt formal submission requirements
for any proposed change, which shall be communicated to the members. A
decision shall be made within 90 days after the initial submission of the
Page 2 Senate Bill 378-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
proposal or submission of any additional information or changes to the
proposal requested by the association in response to the initial submission. A
decision shall be in writing, shall be made in good faith, and may not be
unreasonable, arbitrary, or capricious. If the proposal is disapproved, the
decision shall include an explanation of why the proposal is disapproved and,
if the determination was not issued by the executive board, a description of
the procedure for reconsideration of the decision by the executive board.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 47C-3-107.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 47C-3-107.1. Procedures for fines and suspension of condominium privileges or services.
Unless a specific procedure for the imposition of fines or suspension of condominium
privileges or services is provided for in the declaration, a hearing shall be held before the
executive board or an adjudicatory panel appointed by the executive board to determine if any
unit owner should be fined or if condominium privileges or services should be suspended
pursuant to the powers granted to the association in G.S. 47C-3-102(11). Any adjudicatory panel
appointed by the executive board shall be composed of members of the association who are not
officers of the association or members of the executive board. The unit owner charged shall be
given notice of the charge, opportunity to be heard and to present evidence, and notice of the
decision. A written notice of hearing shall be sent to the unit owner in the manner provided in
G.S. 47C-3-116(e) not less than 10 days prior to the scheduled hearing date. The notice of hearing
shall specify the date, time, and place of the hearing and shall include a general description of
each alleged violation and the action, if any, required to cure each alleged violation. Not less than
two days prior to the scheduled hearing date, the executive board or adjudicatory panel shall
provide the unit owner with the names of any persons whose testimony it intends to offer in
support of the charge and a copy of any documents, photographs, or other exhibits that it intends
to submit in support of the charge. The unit owner shall be given an opportunity to be heard and
to present evidence at the hearing. A written notice of the decision specifying each violation
verified by the evidence and the action, if any, required to cure each verified violation shall be
sent to the unit owner in the manner provided in G.S. 47C-3-116(e). If it is decided that a fine
should be imposed, a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) may be imposed for the
violation and without further hearing, for each day more than five days after the decision that the
violation occurs. occurs, up to a maximum fine of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
Such fines shall be assessments secured by liens under G.S. 47C-3-116. If it is decided that a
suspension of condominium privileges or services should be imposed, the suspension may be
continued without further hearing until the violation or delinquency is cured. A unit owner may
appeal a decision of an adjudicatory panel to the full executive board by delivering written notice
of appeal to the executive board within 15 days after the date of the decision. The executive board
may affirm, vacate, or modify the prior decision of the adjudicatory body."
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 47C-3-116 reads as rewritten:
"§ 47C-3-116. Lien for sums due the association; enforcement.
(a) Any assessment attributable to a unit which remains unpaid for a period of 30 days
or longer shall constitute a lien on that unit when a claim of lien is filed of record in the office of
the clerk of superior court of the county in which the unit is located in the manner provided in
this section. A claim of lien securing a debt consisting of fines or fine-related charges shall be
filed separately from a claim of lien securing other sums owed to the association and shall be
filed within 90 days after the date the fine was imposed. As used in this section, "fines or
fine-related charges" means fines imposed by the association, interest on unpaid fines, or
attorneys' fees incurred by the association related to fines imposed by the association. Once filed,
a claim of lien secures all sums due the association through the date filed and any sums due to
the association thereafter. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, fees, charges, late charges
and other charges imposed pursuant to G.S. 47C-3-102, 47C-3-107, 47C-3-107.1, and 47C-3-115
Senate Bill 378-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
are subject to the claim claims of lien provided for under this section as well as any other sums
due and payable to the association under the declaration, the provisions of this Chapter, or as the
result of an arbitration, mediation, or judicial decision.
(b) The association must provide proper notice of delinquent assessments to the unit
owner before filing a claim of lien. The association must make reasonable and diligent efforts
ensure that its records contain the unit owner's current physical mailing address. address and
current electronic mailing address. No fewer than 15 days prior to filing the lien, the association
shall mail do all of the following:
(1) Mail a statement of the assessment amount due by first class mail to the
physical address of the unit and the unit owner's address of record with the
association and, if different, to the address for the unit owner shown on the
county tax records for the unit. If the unit owner is a corporation or limited
liability company, the statement shall also be sent by first class mail to the
mailing address of the registered agent for the corporation or limited liability
company. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Chapter, the
association is not required to mail a statement to an address known to be a
vacant unit or to a unit for which there is no United States postal address.
(2) Send a statement of the assessment amount due via electronic mail if the
owner has designated an email address as provided in G.S. 55A-1-70(b).
(c) A claim of lien shall set forth the name and address of the association, the name of
the record owner of the unit at the time the claim of lien is filed, a description of the unit, and the
amount of the lien claimed. A claim of lien may also appoint a trustee to conduct a foreclosure
as provided in subsection (f) of this section. The first page of the claim of lien shall contain the
following statement in print that is in boldface, capital letters, and no smaller than the largest
print used elsewhere in the document:
"THIS DOCUMENT CONSTITUTES A LIEN AGAINST YOUR PROPERTY, AND IF THE
LIEN IS NOT PAID, THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY PROCEED WITH
FORECLOSURE ENFORCEMENT AGAINST YOU AND YOUR PROPERTY IN LIKE
MANNER AS A MORTGAGE AS PERMITTED UNDER NORTH CAROLINA LAW."
The person signing the claim of lien on behalf of the association shall attach to and file with
the claim of lien a certificate of service attesting to the attempt of service on the record owner,
which service shall be attempted in accordance with G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4(j), for service of a copy
of a summons and a complaint. If the actual service is not achieved, the person signing the claim
of lien on behalf of the association shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this
subsection if service has been attempted pursuant to both of the following: (i) G.S. 1A-1, Rule
4(j)(1)c, d, or e and (ii) by mailing a copy of the lien by regular, first class mail, postage prepaid
to the physical address of the unit and the unit owner's address of record with the association,
and, if different, to the address for the unit owner shown on the county tax records and the county
real property records for the unit. The association shall also send the owner a copy of the claim
of lien and certificate of service by email if the owner has designated an email address as provided
in G.S. 55A-1-70(b). In the event that the owner of record is not a natural person, and actual
service is not achieved, the person signing the claim of lien on behalf of the association shall be
deemed to have met the requirements of this subsection if service has been attempted once
pursuant to the applicable provisions of G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4(j)(3) through G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4(j)(9).
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Chapter, the association is not required to mail
a claim of lien to an address which is known to be a vacant unit or to a unit for which there is no
United States postal address. A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings
to enforce the lien are instituted within three years after the filing of the claim of lien in the office
of the clerk of superior court. A lien securing a debt consisting of fines or fine-related charges is
extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within one year after the filing
of the claim of lien in the office of the clerk of superior court.
Page 4 Senate Bill 378-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) A claim of lien filed under this section is prior to all liens and encumbrances on a unit
except (i) liens and encumbrances, specifically including, but not limited to, a mortgage or deed
of trust on the unit, recorded before the filing of the claim of lien in the office of the clerk of
superior court and (ii) liens for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments and charges
against the unit. This subsection does not affect the priority of mechanics' or materialmen's liens.
(e) The association shall be entitled to recover the court may, in the court's discretion,
allow the association to recover the reasonable attorneys' fees and costs it the association incurs
in connection with the collection of any sums due. A lot owner may not be required to pay
attorneys' fees and court costs until the lot owner is notified in writing of the association's intent
to seek payment of attorneys' fees, costs, and expenses. The notice must be sent by first-class
mail to the physical address of the lot and the lot owner's address of record with the association
and, if different, to the address for the lot owner shown on the county tax records for the lot. The
association must make reasonable and diligent efforts to ensure that its records contain the lot
owner's current mailing address. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Chapter, there
shall be no requirement that notice under this subsection be mailed to an address which is known
to be a vacant lot on which no dwelling has been constructed or a lot for which there is no United
States postal address. The notice shall set out the outstanding balance due as of the date of the
notice and state that the lot owner has 15 days from the mailing of the notice by first-class mail
to pay the outstanding balance without the attorneys' fees and court costs. If the lot owner pays
the outstanding balance within this period, then the lot owner shall have no obligation to pay
attorneys' fees, costs, or expenses. The notice shall also inform the lot owner of the opportunity
to contact a representative of the association to discuss a payment schedule for the outstanding
balance, as provided in subsection (i) of this section, and shall provide the name and telephone
number of the representative.
(f) Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the association, acting through
the executive board, may foreclose a claim of lien securing a debt consisting of sums due the
association other than fines or fine-related charges in like manner as a mortgage or deed of trust
on real estate under power of sale, as provided in Article 2A of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes,
if the assessment remains unpaid delinquency has continued for 90 180 days or more. The
association shall not foreclose the claim of lien unless the executive board votes to commence
the proceeding against the specific unit. The following provisions and procedures shall be
applicable to and complied with in every nonjudicial power of sale foreclosure of a claim of lien,
and these provisions and procedures shall control to the extent they are inconsistent or in conflict
with the provisions of Article 2A of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes:
…
(5) After the association has filed a claim of lien and prior to the commencement
of a nonjudicial foreclosure, the association shall give to the unit owner notice
of the association's intention to commence a nonjudicial foreclosure to enforce
its claim of lien. The notice shall contain the information required in
G.S. 45-21.16(c)(5a).G.S. 45-21.16(c)(5) and G.S. 45-21.16(c)(5a) and shall
specifically reference the unit owner's right of redemption provided under
subdivision (8) of this subsection. The notice shall be sent by first-class mail
to the physical address of the unit and the unit owner's address of record with
the association and, if different, to the address for the unit owner shown on
the county tax records for the unit.
(5a) The notice of hearing required pursuant to G.S. 45-21.16(a) shall be
accompanied by the association's certification of the actions it has taken to
give the owner notice of delinquent assessments in compliance with
subsection (b) of this section.
(5b) At the commencement of the hearing, the clerk shall inquire as to whether the
owner occupies the unit as his or her principal residence. If it appears that the
Senate Bill 378-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
owner does currently occupy the unit as a principal residence, the clerk shall
further inquire as to the efforts the association has made to communicate with
the owner and to attempt to resolve the matter voluntarily before the
foreclosure proceeding. The clerk's inquiry shall not be required if the
association has submitted, at or before the hearing, an affidavit briefly
describing any efforts that have been made to resolve the default with the
owner and the results of any such efforts.
(5c) The clerk shall order the hearing continued if the clerk finds that there is good
cause to believe that additional time or additional efforts have a reasonable
likelihood of resolving the delinquency without foreclosure. In determining
whether to continue the hearing, the clerk may consider (i) whether the
association has offered the debtor an opportunity to resolve the foreclosure
under a payment schedule pursuant to subsection (i) of this section, (ii)
whether the association has engaged in actual responsive communication with
the owner, including telephone conferences or in-person meetings with the
owner or other actual two-party communications, (iii) whether the owner has
indicated that he or she has the intent and ability to resolve the delinquency
by making future payments under a payment plan, and (iv) whether the
initiation or continuance of good-faith voluntary resolution efforts between
the parties may resolve the matter without a foreclosure sale. Where good
cause exists to continue the hearing, the clerk shall order the hearing continued
to a date and time certain not more than 90 days from the date scheduled for
the original hearing. Nothing in this part shall limit the authority of the clerk
to continue a hearing for other good cause shown.
…
(g) The provisions of subsection (f) of this section do not prohibit or prevent an
association from pursuing judicial foreclosure of a claim of lien, lien securing a debt consisting
of sums due the association other than fines and fine-related charges, from taking other actions
to recover the sums due the association, or from accepting a deed in lieu of foreclosure. Any
judgment, decree, or order in any judicial foreclosure or civil action relating to the collection of
assessments shall include an award of costs and reasonable attorneys' fees for the prevailing
party, which shall not be subject to the limitation provided in subdivision (f)(12) of this section.
(h) A claim of lien securing a debt consisting solely of fines imposed by the association,
interest on unpaid fines, or attorneys' fees incurred by the association solely associated with fines
imposed by the association or fine-related charges may only be enforced by judicial foreclosure,
as provided in Article 29A of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes. the filing of a civil action seeking
a judgment. In addition, an association shall not levy, charge, or attempt to collect a service,
collection, consulting, or administration fee from any unit owner unless the fee is expressly
allowed in the declaration, and any claim of lien securing a debt consisting solely of these fees
may only be enforced by judicial foreclosure, as provided in Article 29A of Chapter 1 of the
General Statutes.the filing of a civil action seeking a judgment. Liens arising as a result of the
entry of a judgment in favor of the association in any such civil action shall relate back and be
effective as of the date the claim of lien was filed.
…."
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
claims of lien filed and instruments presented for registration on or after that date.
SECTION 4. G.S. 47C-3-118 reads as rewritten:
"§ 47C-3-118. Association records.records and contracts.
…
(a1) A unit owner or the unit owner's authorized agent is entitled to inspect and copy, at a
reasonable time and location specified by the association, any contract entered into by the
Page 6 Senate Bill 378-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
association if the unit owner gives the association written notice of the demand at least five
business days before the date on which the unit owner wishes to inspect and copy and the request
satisfies the conditions for inspection set forth in G.S. 55A-16-02(c). A demand to inspect made
pursuant to this subsection shall be presumed to have been made in good faith and for a proper
purpose. In any action to compel the inspection and copying of documents, the court may award
reasonable attorneys' fees to the prevailing party. If the association does not allow a unit owner
who complies with this subsection to inspect and copy the requested contract, and if a court of
competent jurisdiction thereafter enters an order compelling the association to do so, the court
shall also order the association to pay the unit owner's costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees,
incurred to obtain the order.
(b) The association, upon written request, shall furnish a unit owner or the unit owner's
authorized agents a statement setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments and other charges
against a unit. The statement shall be furnished within 10 business days after receipt of the request
and is binding on the association, the executive board, and every unit owner. The association, its
managers, or its agents may charge a reasonable fee for providing statements of unpaid
assessments and other charges, not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) per statement or
request, and an additional expedite expedited fee in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars
($100.00) if the request is made within 48 hours of closing.item is requested to be furnished less
than 10 days after receipt of the request.
…
(d) The association shall keep written records of any policy regarding automatic license
plate reader systems adopted pursuant to G.S. 20-183.33. The records shall be made reasonably
available for examination by any unit owner and the unit owner's authorized agents."
SECTION 5. G.S. 47F-3-102 reads as rewritten:
"§ 47F-3-102. Powers of owners' association.
Unless the articles of incorporation or the declaration expressly provides to the contrary, the
association may do all of the following:
…
(3) Hire and discharge managing agents and other employees, agents, and
independent contractors. A contract between an association and a managing
agent shall not have a term exceeding two years and shall not contain an
automatic renewal provision that requires the association to give notice of
nonrenewal more than 60 days prior to the contract's anniversary date. Any
contract with a managing agent that is automatically renewed shall be
terminable by the association for any reason upon 90 days' notice. A managing
agent shall not be compensated in whole or in part based on the amount of
fines collected by the managing agent on behalf of the association.
…
(6) Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of
common elements.elements; provided, however, that in the absence of an
express authorization in the declaration, an association shall not enforce any
restriction on parking of a personal vehicle on a public street, public road, or
public right-of-way for which the North Carolina Department of
Transportation or local government has assumed responsibility for
maintenance and repairs, unless the authority to regulate such parking has
been expressly delegated to the association by the Department of
Transportation or local government under an agreement prescribing the
manner in which the association may exercise that authority. As used in this
subdivision, "personal vehicle" means an automobile with a gross weight of
less than 26,001 pounds that is used for personal pleasure, travel, or
commuting to and from a place of work, and does not include a motor home
Senate Bill 378-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
or self-propelled recreational vehicle, or an automobile that is otherwise used
primarily in connection with any commercial endeavor or business.
…
(12) After notice and an opportunity to be heard, impose reasonable fines or
suspend privileges or services provided by the association (except rights of
access to lots) for reasonable periods for violations of the declaration, bylaws,
and rules and regulations of the association. No fine shall be levied for
violation of a provision restricting or prohibiting tutoring, educational lessons,
academic lessons, music lessons, or swimming lessons provided on the
owner's lot to a group of no more than five people at any one time, regardless
of whether compensation is received for such lessons.
…
(13a) Impose reasonable charges in connection with the preparation of statements a
lender's questionnaire or certification or a statement of unpaid assessments,
which must be furnished within 10 business days after receipt of the request,
in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) per statement or
request, item requested, and an additional expedite expedited fee in an amount
not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) if the request is made within 48
hours of closing, all of which item is requested to be furnished less than 10
days after receipt of the request. These charges may be collected by the
association, its managers, or its agents. Any charge for preparation of a
lender's questionnaire or certification shall be billed to the requesting party.
Neither the association nor its managing agent shall impose any charge upon
a lot owner or a prospective purchaser of a lot in connection with the
conveyance of a lot unless the charge is expressly authorized in this
subdivision, or unless the charge is authorized in the declaration and is not
otherwise expressly prohibited by law. Violation of this subdivision by an
association or by its managing agent shall constitute an unfair and deceptive
trade practice under G.S. 75-1.1.
(13b) Impose a reasonable charge for providing copies of records requested by a
member, not to exceed the actual cost of photocopying the records, including
the cost of materials used in responding to the request and the cost of shipping
if shipping is required.
…
(15a) Exercise any authority granted to it under the declaration to approve or
disapprove any proposed changes on a lot or limited common element. In
exercising such authority, the association shall provide a fair, reasonable, and
expeditious procedure for making its decision, which procedure shall be set
forth in the association's governing documents. The procedures shall state the
maximum time for issuance of any decision on a proposal or a request for
reconsideration. An association may adopt formal submission requirements
for any proposed change, which shall be communicated to the members. A
decision shall be made within 90 days after the initial submission of the
proposal or submission of any additional information or changes to the
proposal requested by the association in response to the initial submission. A
decision shall be in writing, shall be made in good faith, and may not be
unreasonable, arbitrary, or capricious. If the proposal is disapproved, the
decision shall include an explanation of why the proposal is disapproved and,
if the determination was not issued by the executive board, a description of
the procedure for reconsideration of the decision by the executive board.
…."
Page 8 Senate Bill 378-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 6. G.S. 47F-3-107.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 47F-3-107.1. Procedures for fines and suspension of planned community privileges or
services.
Unless a specific procedure for the imposition of fines or suspension of planned community
privileges or services is provided for in the declaration, a hearing shall be held before the
executive board or an adjudicatory panel appointed by the executive board to determine if any
lot owner should be fined or if planned community privileges or services should be suspended
pursuant to the powers granted to the association in G.S. 47F-3-102(11) and (12). Any
adjudicatory panel appointed by the executive board shall be composed of members of the
association who are not officers of the association or members of the executive board. The lot
owner charged shall be given notice of the charge, opportunity to be heard and to present
evidence, and notice of the decision. A written notice of hearing shall be sent to the unit owner
in the manner provided in G.S. 47F-3-116(e) not less than 10 days prior to the scheduled hearing
date. The notice of hearing shall specify the date, time, and place of the hearing and shall include
a general description of each alleged violation and the action, if any, required to cure each alleged
violation. Not less than two days prior to the scheduled hearing date, the executive board or
adjudicatory panel shall provide the unit owner with the names of any persons whose testimony
it intends to offer in support of the charge and a copy of any documents, photographs, or other
exhibits that it intends to submit in support of the charge. The unit owner shall be given an
opportunity to be heard and to present evidence at the hearing. A written notice of the decision
specifying each violation verified by the evidence and the action, if any, required to cure each
verified violation shall be sent to the unit owner in the manner provided in G.S. 47F-3-116(e). If
it is decided that a fine should be imposed, a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00)
may be imposed for the violation and without further hearing, for each day more than five days
after the decision that the violation occurs. occurs, up to a maximum fine of two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500). Such fines shall be assessments secured by liens under G.S. 47F-3-116.
If it is decided that a suspension of planned community privileges or services should be imposed,
the suspension may be continued without further hearing until the violation or delinquency is
cured. The lot owner may appeal the decision of an adjudicatory panel to the full executive board
by delivering written notice of appeal to the executive board within 15 days after the date of the
decision. The executive board may affirm, vacate, or modify the prior decision of the
adjudicatory body."
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 47F-3-116 reads as rewritten:
"§ 47F-3-116. Lien for sums due the association; enforcement.
(a) Any assessment attributable to a lot which remains unpaid for a period of 30 days or
longer shall constitute a lien on that lot when a claim of lien is filed of record in the office of the
clerk of superior court of the county in which the lot is located in the manner provided in this
section. A claim of lien securing a debt consisting of fines or fine-related charges shall be filed
separately from a claim of lien securing other sums due the association and shall be filed within
90 days after the date the fine was imposed. As used in this section, "fines or fine-related charges"
means fines imposed by the association, interest on unpaid fines, or attorneys' fees incurred by
the association related to fines imposed by the association. Once filed, a claim of lien secures all
sums due the association through the date filed and any sums due to the association thereafter.
Unless the declaration provides otherwise, fees, charges, late charges, and other charges imposed
pursuant to G.S. 47F-3-102, 47F-3-107, 47F-3-107.1, and 47F-3-115 are subject to the claim
claims of lien provided for under this section as well as any other sums due and payable to the
association under the declaration, the provisions of this Chapter, or as the result of an arbitration,
mediation, or judicial decision.
(b) The association must provide proper notice of delinquent assessments to the lot owner
before filing a claim of lien. The association must make reasonable and diligent efforts to ensure
that its records contain the lot owner's current physical mailing address. address and current
Senate Bill 378-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
electronic mailing address. No fewer than 15 days prior to filing the lien, the association shall
mail do all of the following:
(1) Mail a statement of the assessment amount due by first-class mail to the
physical address of the lot and the lot owner's address of record with the
association and, if different, to the address for the lot owner shown on the
county tax records for the lot. If the lot owner is a corporation or limited
liability company, the statement shall also be sent by first-class mail to the
mailing address of the registered agent for the corporation or limited liability
company. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Chapter, the
association is not required to mail a statement to an address known to be a
vacant lot on which no dwelling has been constructed or to a lot for which
there is no United States postal address.
(2) Send a statement of the assessment amount due via electronic mail if the
owner has designated an email address as provided in G.S. 55A-1-70(b).
(c) A claim of lien shall set forth the name and address of the association, the name of
the record owner of the lot at the time the claim of lien is filed, a description of the lot, and the
amount of the lien claimed. A claim of lien may also appoint a trustee to conduct a foreclosure,
as provided in subsection (f) of this section. The first page of the claim of lien shall contain the
following statement in print that is in boldface, capital letters, and no smaller than the largest
print used elsewhere in the document:
"THIS DOCUMENT CONSTITUTES A LIEN AGAINST YOUR PROPERTY, AND IF THE
LIEN IS NOT PAID, THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY PROCEED WITH
FORECLOSURE ENFORCEMENT AGAINST YOU AND YOUR PROPERTY IN LIKE
MANNER AS A MORTGAGE AS PERMITTED UNDER NORTH CAROLINA LAW."
The person signing the claim of lien on behalf of the association shall attach to and file with
the claim of lien a certificate of service attesting to the attempt of service on the record owner,
which service shall be attempted in accordance with G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4(j), for service of a copy
of a summons and a complaint. If the actual service is not achieved, the person signing the claim
of lien on behalf of the association shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this
subsection if service has been attempted pursuant to both of the following: (i) G.S. 1A-1, Rule
4(j)(1)c, d, or e and (ii) by mailing a copy of the lien by regular, first-class mail, postage prepaid
to the physical address of the lot and the lot owner's address of record with the association, and,
if different, to the address for the lot owner shown on the county tax records and the county real
property records for the lot. The association shall also send the owner a copy of the claim of lien
and certificate of service by email if the owner has designated an email address as provided in
G.S. 55A-1-70(b). In the event that the owner of record is not a natural person, and actual service
is not achieved, the person signing the claim of lien on behalf of the association shall be deemed
to have met the requirements of this subsection if service has been attempted once pursuant to
the applicable provisions of G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4(j)(3) through G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4(j)(9).
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Chapter, the association is not required to mail
a claim of lien to an address which is known to be a vacant lot on which no dwelling has been
constructed or to a lot for which there is no United States postal address. A lien for unpaid
assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within three
years after the filing of the claim of lien in the office of the clerk of superior court. A lien securing
a debt consisting of fines or fine-related charges is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce
the lien are instituted within one year after the filing of the claim of lien in the office of the clerk
of superior court.
(d) A claim of lien filed under this section is prior to all liens and encumbrances on a lot
except (i) liens and encumbrances, specifically including, but not limited to, a mortgage or deed
of trust on the lot, recorded before the filing of the claim of lien in the office of the clerk of
Page 10 Senate Bill 378-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
superior court and (ii) liens for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments and charges
against the lot. This subsection does not affect the priority of mechanics' or materialmen's liens.
(e) The association shall be entitled to recover the court may, in the court's discretion,
allow the association to recover the reasonable attorneys' fees and costs it the association incurs
in connection with the collection of any sums due. A lot owner may not be required to pay
attorneys' fees and court costs until the lot owner is notified in writing of the association's intent
to seek payment of attorneys' fees, costs, and expenses. The notice must be sent by first-class
mail to the physical address of the lot and the lot owner's address of record with the association
and, if different, to the address for the lot owner shown on the county tax records for the lot. The
association must make reasonable and diligent efforts to ensure that its records contain the lot
owner's current mailing address. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Chapter, there
shall be no requirement that notice under this subsection be mailed to an address which is known
to be a vacant lot on which no dwelling has been constructed or a lot for which there is no United
States postal address. The notice shall set out the outstanding balance due as of the date of the
notice and state that the lot owner has 15 days from the mailing of the notice by first-class mail
to pay the outstanding balance without the attorneys' fees and court costs. If the lot owner pays
the outstanding balance within this period, then the lot owner shall have no obligation to pay
attorneys' fees, costs, or expenses. The notice shall also inform the lot owner of the opportunity
to contact a representative of the association to discuss a payment schedule for the outstanding
balance, as provided in subsection (i) of this section, and shall provide the name and telephone
number of the representative.
(f) Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the association, acting through
the executive board, may foreclose a claim of lien securing a debt consisting of sums due the
association other than fines or fine-related charges in like manner as a mortgage or deed of trust
on real estate under power of sale, as provided in Article 2A of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes,
if the assessment remains unpaid delinquency has continued for 90 180 days or more. The
association shall not foreclose the claim of lien unless the executive board votes to commence
the proceeding against the specific lot.
The following provisions and procedures shall be applicable to and complied with in every
nonjudicial power of sale foreclosure of a claim of lien, and these provisions and procedures shall
control to the extent they are inconsistent or in conflict with the provisions of Article 2A of
Chapter 45 of the General Statutes:
…
(5) After the association has filed a claim of lien and prior to the commencement
of a nonjudicial foreclosure, the association shall give to the lot owner notice
of the association's intention to commence a nonjudicial foreclosure to enforce
its claim of lien. The notice shall contain the information required in
G.S. 45-21.16(c)(5a).G.S. 45-21.16(c)(5) and G.S. 45-21.16(c)(5a) and shall
specifically reference the lot owner's right of redemption provided under
subdivision (8) of this subsection. The notice shall be sent by first-class mail
to the physical address of the lot and the lot owner's address of record with the
association and, if different, to the address for the lot owner shown on the
county tax records for the lot.
(5a) The notice of hearing required pursuant to G.S. 45-21.16(a) shall be
accompanied by the association's certification of the actions it has taken to
give the owner notice of delinquent assessments in compliance with
subsection (b) of this section.
(5b) At the commencement of the hearing, the clerk shall inquire as to whether the
owner occupies the lot as his or her principal residence. If it appears that the
owner does currently occupy the lot as a principal residence, the clerk shall
further inquire as to the efforts the association has made to communicate with
Senate Bill 378-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the owner and to attempt to resolve the matter voluntarily before the
foreclosure proceeding. The clerk's inquiry shall not be required if the
association has submitted, at or before the hearing, an affidavit briefly
describing any efforts that have been made to resolve the default with the
owner and the results of any such efforts.
(5c) The clerk shall order the hearing continued if the clerk finds that there is good
cause to believe that additional time or additional efforts have a reasonable
likelihood of resolving the delinquency without foreclosure. In determining
whether to continue the hearing, the clerk may consider (i) whether the
association has offered the owner an opportunity to resolve the foreclosure
under a payment schedule pursuant to subsection (i) of this section, (ii)
whether the association has engaged in actual responsive communication with
the owner, including telephone conferences or in-person meetings with the
owner or other actual two-party communications, (iii) whether the owner has
indicated that he or she has the intent and ability to resolve the delinquency
by making future payments under a payment plan, and (iv) whether the
initiation or continuance of good-faith voluntary resolution efforts between
the parties may resolve the matter without a foreclosure sale. Where good
cause exists to continue the hearing, the clerk shall order the hearing continued
to a date and time certain not more than 90 days from the date scheduled for
the original hearing. Nothing in this part shall limit the authority of the clerk
to continue a hearing for other good cause shown.
…
(g) The provisions of subsection (f) of this section do not prohibit or prevent an
association from pursuing judicial foreclosure of a claim of lien, lien securing a debt consisting
of sums due the association other than fines and fine-related charges, from taking other actions
to recover the sums due the association, or from accepting a deed in lieu of foreclosure. Any
judgment, decree, or order in any judicial foreclosure or civil action relating to the collection of
assessments shall include an award of costs and reasonable attorneys' fees for the prevailing
party, which shall not be subject to the limitation provided in subdivision (f)(12) of this section.
(h) A claim of lien securing a debt consisting solely of fines imposed by the association,
interest on unpaid fines, or attorneys' fees incurred by the association solely associated with fines
imposed by the association or fine-related charges may only be enforced by judicial foreclosure,
as provided in Article 29A of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes. the filing of a civil action seeking
a judgment. In addition, an association shall not levy, charge, or attempt to collect a service,
collection, consulting, or administration fee from any lot owner unless the fee is expressly
allowed in the declaration, and any claim of lien securing a debt consisting solely of these fees
may only be enforced by judicial foreclosure, as provided in Article 29A of Chapter 1 of the
General Statutes.the filing of a civil action seeking a judgment. Liens arising as a result of the
entry of a judgment in favor of the association in any such civil action shall relate back and be
effective as of the date the claim of lien was filed. If, prior to any hearing held pursuant to a civil
action filed under this subsection, the lot owner satisfies the debt giving rise to the civil action,
the association shall dismiss the civil action and cancel the claim of lien. The lot owner shall
have all rights granted under Article 4 of Chapter 45 of the General Statutes to ensure the
association's satisfaction of the claim of lien, and the association shall not be entitled to the
collection or award of any attorneys' fees or court costs related to the dismissed civil action or
cancelled claim of lien.
…."
SECTION 7.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
claims of lien filed and instruments presented for registration on or after that date.
SECTION 8. G.S. 47F-3-118 reads as rewritten:
Page 12 Senate Bill 378-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 47F-3-118. Association records.records and contracts.
…
(a1) A lot owner or the lot owner's authorized agent is entitled to inspect and copy, at a
reasonable time and location specified by the association, any contract entered into by the
association if the lot owner gives the association written notice of the demand at least five
business days before the date on which the lot owner wishes to inspect and copy and the request
satisfies the conditions for inspection set forth in G.S. 55A-16-02(c). A demand to inspect made
pursuant to this subsection shall be presumed to have been made in good faith and for a proper
purpose. In any action to compel the inspection and copying of documents, the court may award
reasonable attorneys' fees to the prevailing party. If the association does not allow a lot owner
who complies with this subsection to inspect and copy the requested contract, and if a court of
competent jurisdiction thereafter enters an order compelling the association to do so, the court
shall also order the association to pay the lot owner's costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees,
incurred to obtain the order.
(b) The association, upon written request, shall furnish to a lot owner or the lot owner's
authorized agents a statement setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments and other charges
against a lot. The statement shall be furnished within 10 business days after receipt of the request
and is binding on the association, the executive board, and every lot owner. The association, its
managers, or its agents may charge a reasonable fee for providing statements of unpaid
assessments, not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) per statement or request, and an
additional expedite expedited fee in an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00) if
the request for a statement is made within 48 hours of closing.item is requested to be furnished
less than 10 days after receipt of the request.
…
(d) The association shall keep written records of any policy regarding automatic license
plate reader systems adopted pursuant to G.S. 20-183.33. The records shall be made reasonably
available for examination by any lot owner and the lot owner's authorized agents."

PART II. PRELITIGATION MEDIATION
SECTION 9.(a) G.S. 7A-38.3F reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-38.3F. Prelitigation mediation of condominium and homeowners owners' association
disputes.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Association. – An association of unit or lot owners organized as allowed under
North Carolina law, including G.S. 47C-3-101 and G.S. 47F-3-101.
(2) Dispute. – Any matter relating to real estate under the jurisdiction of an
association about which the member and association cannot agree. The term
"dispute" does not include matters expressly exempted in subsection (b) of
this section.
(3) Executive board. – The body, regardless of name, designated in the
declaration to act on behalf of an association.
(4) Mediator. – A neutral person who acts to encourage and facilitate a resolution
of a dispute between an association and a member.
(5) Member. – A person who is a member of an association of unit or lot owners
organized as allowed under North Carolina law, including G.S. 47C-3-101
and G.S. 47F-3-101.
(6) Party or parties. – An association or member who is involved in a dispute, as
that term is defined in subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(a1) Disputes related solely to a member's failure to timely pay an association assessment
or any fines or fees associated with the levying or collection of an association assessment are not
covered under this section.
Senate Bill 378-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Voluntary Prelitigation Mediation. – Prior to filing a civil action, the The parties to a
dispute arising under Chapter 47C of the General Statutes (North Carolina Condominium Act),
Chapter 47F of the General Statutes (North Carolina Planned Community Act), or an
association's declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations are encouraged to initiate mediation
pursuant to this section. However, disputes related solely to a member's failure to timely pay an
association assessment or any fines or fees associated with the levying or collection of an
association assessment are not covered under this section.may agree at any time to mediation of
the dispute pursuant to this section.
(b1) Mandatory Prelitigation Mediation. – Prior to filing a civil action arising under
Chapter 47C of the General Statutes (North Carolina Condominium Act), Chapter 47F of the
General Statutes (North Carolina Planned Community Act), or an association's declaration,
bylaws, or rules and regulations, a party shall initiate mediation pursuant to this section. If an
action is initiated, it shall, upon the motion of any party prior to trial, be dismissed without
prejudice by the court unless any one or more of the following apply:
(1) The nonmoving party has satisfied the requirements of this section, and this
fact is indicated in the mediator's certification issued under subsection (g) of
this section.
(2) The court finds that a mediator failed to issue a mediator's certification under
subsection (g) of this section indicating that the nonmoving party satisfied the
requirements of this section.
(3) The court finds good cause for a failure to attempt mediation. Good cause
includes a determination that the time delay required for mediation would
likely result in irreparable harm or that injunctive relief is otherwise
warranted.
(c) Initiation of Mediation. – Either an association or a member may contact the North
Carolina Dispute Resolution Commission or the Mediation Network of North Carolina for the
name of a mediator or community mediation center. Upon contacting a mediator, either the
association or member may supply to the mediator the physical address of the other party, or the
party's representative, and the party's telephone number and e-mail address, if known. The
mediator shall contact the party, or the party's representative, to notify him or her the party of the
request to mediate. If the parties agree to mediate, they Unless the mediation is waived pursuant
to subsection (e) of this section, the parties shall request in writing that the mediator schedule the
mediation. The mediator shall then notify the parties in writing of the date, time, and location of
the mediation, which shall be scheduled not later than 25 days after the mediator receives the
written request from the parties.
(d) Mediation Procedure. – The following procedures shall apply to mediation under this
section:
(1) Attendance. – The mediator shall determine who may attend mediation. The
mediator may require the executive board or a large group of members to
designate one or more persons to serve as their representatives in the
mediation.
(2) All parties are expected to attend mediation. The mediator may allow a party
to participate in mediation by telephone or other electronic means if the
mediator determines that the party has a compelling reason to do so.
(3) If the parties cannot reach a final agreement in mediation because to do so
would require the approval of the full executive board or the approval of a
majority or some other percentage of the members of the association, the
mediator may recess the mediation meeting to allow the executive board or
members to review and vote on the agreement.
(e) Decline Mediation. – Either party to a dispute may decline mediation under this
section. If either party declines mediation after mediation has been initiated under subsection (c)
Page 14 Senate Bill 378-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of this section but mediation has not been held, the party declining mediation shall inform the
mediator and the other party in writing of his or her decision to decline mediation. No costs shall
be assessed to any party if either party declines mediation prior to the occurrence of an initial
mediation meeting.Waiver of Mediation. – The parties to a dispute may agree to waive mediation
required by this section by informing the mediator of the waiver in writing.
(f) Costs of Mediation. – The costs of mediation, including the mediator's fees, shall be
shared equally by the parties unless otherwise agreed to by the parties. Fees shall be due and
payable at the end of each mediation meeting. A mediator may charge a reasonable fee, as
applicable, to prepare a mediator's certification required under subsection (g) of this section when
parties to a dispute agree to waive mediation pursuant to subsection (e) of this section or when
one or more parties failed or refused without good cause to attend the mediation meetings or
otherwise participate in the mediation. When an attorney represents a party to the mediation, that
party shall pay his or her the attorneys' fees.
(g) Certification That Mediation Concluded. – Upon a waiver of the mediation under
subsection (e) of this section or upon the conclusion of mediation, the mediator shall prepare a
certification stating the date on which the mediation was concluded and a statement of the general
results of the mediation, including, as applicable, that the parties waived the mediation, that an
agreement was reached or reached, that mediation was attempted but an agreement was not
reached. reached, or that one or more parties failed or refused without good cause to attend the
mediation meetings or otherwise participate in the mediation. If both parties participate in
mediation and a cause of action involving the dispute mediated is later filed, either party may file
the certificate with the clerk of court, and the parties shall not be required to mediate again under
any provision of law. The Supreme Court may adopt additional rules and standards to implement
this section, including an exemption from the provisions of G.S. 7A-38.1 for cases in which
mediation was attempted under this section. The sanctions in G.S. 7A-38.1(g) do not apply to
prelitigation mediation conducted under this section.
…
(j) Association Duty to Notify. – Each association shall, in writing, shall notify the
members of the association each year annually in writing that they may initiate mediation under
this section to try to resolve a dispute with the association. The association shall publish the
notice required in this subsection on the association's Web site; but if the association does not
have a Web site, the association website or it shall publish the notice at the same time and in the
same manner as the names and addresses of all officers and board members of the association
are published as provided in G.S. 47C-3-103 and G.S. 47F-3-103."
SECTION 9.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies to
actions filed on or after that date.

PART III. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE TO COLLECT AND REPORT ON OWNERS'
ASSOCIATION COMPLAINTS
SECTION 10.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 114 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 114-8.8. Collection and report of owners' association complaint data.
(a) The Department of Justice shall receive and record data from all complaints
concerning disputes between associations of unit owners or lot owners and their members as
required by this section. The Department of Justice shall publish a complaint form providing for
electronic submission of those complaints on its website. When the Department receives a
complaint via phone, mail, or online submission, it shall collect the following information from
the complainant:
(1) The name and contact information of the complainant.
(2) Whether the complainant is an association of unit owners or lot owners, or is
a unit owner or lot owner belonging to those associations.
Senate Bill 378-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The name and contact information of the other party or parties to the dispute
giving rise to the complaint.
(4) The name, address, and contact information of the association management
company, if any, involved in the dispute.
(5) Details on whether the association member involved in the dispute (i) was
informed of the requirement of membership in the association as a condition
of unit or lot ownership and, if so informed, when and by whom, (ii) received
a copy of the governing documents of the association before obtaining title to
the property, (iii) was denied access to the association's governing documents,
and (iv) understood the rights and obligations of owners and the association
under the governing documents.
(6) The nature of the complaint.
(7) The background information regarding the dispute, including whether the
member and association communicated about the dispute and whether all
other remedies available under the association's governing documents were
exhausted before the complaint was made.
(8) The complainant's understanding of the rights and obligations under the
association's governing documents as they relate to the dispute.
(9) The complainant's desired remedy regarding the dispute.
(b) Upon receiving the complaint, the Department shall provide a copy of the complaint
to the party complained against informing the party of the complaint made against it and allowing
for the party to respond.
(c) The Department shall publish the following information on its website:
(1) Information on the process to submit complaints pursuant to this section.
(2) Information about the laws and documents governing associations of unit
owners and lot owners in North Carolina.
(3) General information about roles, rights, and responsibilities of associations of
unit owners and lot owners, their members, and other related parties.
(4) Any other information the Department deems relevant to understanding the
rights and obligations of associations of unit owners and lot owners and
members of such associations.
(d) The Department is prohibited from promulgating regulations or issuing guidelines
concerning the administration, governance, or governing documents of associations of unit
owners or lot owners. The Department shall not serve as an arbiter in disputes between an
association of unit owners or lot owners and its members.
(e) By July 1 of each year, the Department shall submit a report to the House Standing
Committee on Commerce and Economic Development, the Senate Standing Committee on
Commerce and Insurance, and the Fiscal Research Division and shall also publish the report on
its website. The report shall include, at a minimum, a summary of all of the following:
(1) The total number of complaints received pursuant to this section.
(2) The number of those complaints submitted by unit owners or lot owners.
(3) The number of those complaints submitted by associations of unit owners or
lot owners.
(4) The number of complaints originating in each county of this State.
(5) The number of complaints that involved association management companies.
(6) The nature of the disputes reflected in the complaints, including:
a. Access to association records.
b. Access to executive board meetings.
c. Assessments.
d. Executive board transparency.
e. Fines.
Page 16 Senate Bill 378-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
f. Collections of delinquent accounts.
g. Liens.
h. Foreclosures.
i. Content of restrictive covenants.
j. Enforcement of restrictive covenants.
(7) A ranking of the top five disputes based on the nature of the dispute reflected
in the complaints.
(8) The number of responses to the complaints received by the Department.
The information summarized in the report must be categorized, filterable, and searchable. The
Department must redact any personal or private information from the report, such as names,
addresses, and telephone numbers of individuals. This redaction requirement does not apply to
information concerning a homeowners association or a homeowners association management
company."
SECTION 10.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART IV. ASSOCIATION USE OF AUTOMATIC LICENSE PLATE READER
SYSTEMS
SECTION 11.(a) Article 3D of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 20-183.32B. Use of automatic license plate reader systems by certain private
associations.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply to this section:
(1) Association. – Either (i) an owner's association organized under
G.S. 47F-3-101 or (ii) a unit owner's association organized under
G.S. 47C-3-101.
(2) Lot owner. – As defined in G.S. 47F-1-103.
(3) Unit owner. – As defined in G.S. 47C-1-103.
(b) An association shall not operate an automatic license plate reader system without first
doing all of the following:
(1) Notifying a local law enforcement agency of the association's intent to begin
using the system at least 30 days before the system is operational.
(2) Providing a local law enforcement agency ongoing access to the system.
(3) Notifying all lot owners or unit owners of the association's intent to begin
using the system at least 30 days before the system is operational.
(4) Adopting a written policy governing the system's use before the automatic
license plate reader system is operational. The policy shall address all of the
following:
a. Data retention. The data retention policy adopted pursuant to this
subdivision shall provide that captured plate data will not be retained
for longer than 30 days unless a law enforcement agency requests that
specific data be retained for a longer duration, in accordance with
G.S. 20-183.32.
b. Training of automatic license plate reader system operators.
c. Supervisory oversight of automatic license plate reader system use.
d. Internal data security and access.
e. Annual or more frequent auditing to ensure proper operation of the
system.
f. Maintenance and calibration of the system, as recommended by the
system's manufacturer.
g. Annual or more frequent notifications to lot owners or unit owners if
the association continues to operate the system.
Senate Bill 378-First Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Data obtained by an association in accordance with this section shall be accessed,
disclosed, preserved, or retained only for the purpose of assisting law enforcement agencies in
connection with a law enforcement purpose. Notwithstanding, data obtained under the authority
of this section shall not be used for the enforcement of traffic violations."
SECTION 11.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 12. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law. The provisions in Sections 1 and 5 of this act relating to managing agent compensation apply
to contracts between an association and a managing agent entered into on or after January 1,
2026.
Page 18 Senate Bill 378-First Edition